tests/loc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "<loc> tests":
    хос<n><sg><px1sg><loc><attr> : хоспунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px1sg><loc><subst><nom> : хоспунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px2sg><loc><attr> : хоскунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px2sg><loc><subst><nom> : хоскунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px3sg><loc><attr> : хоһунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px3sg><loc><subst><nom> : хоһунааҕы

    хос<n><sg><px1pl><loc><attr> : хоспутунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px1pl><loc><subst><nom> : хоспутунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px2pl><loc><attr> : хоскутунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px2pl><loc><subst><nom> : хоскутунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px3pl><loc><attr> : хосторунааҕы
    хос<n><sg><px3pl><loc><subst><nom> : хосторунааҕы

    # no form for хос<n><sg><px1sg> - хосторумнааҕы ?
    # no form for хос<n><sg><px2sg> - хосторуҥнааҕы ?
    хос<n><pl><px3sg><loc><attr> : хосторунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px3sg><loc><subst><nom> : хосторунааҕы

    хос<n><pl><px1pl><loc><attr> : хосторбутунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px1pl><loc><subst><nom> : хосторбутунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px2pl><loc><attr> : хосторгутунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px2pl><loc><subst><nom> : хосторгутунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px3pl><loc><attr> : хосторунааҕы
    хос<n><pl><px3pl><loc><subst><nom> : хосторунааҕы

    
